Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 13.2 Certification of Childcare and Youth-Serving Workers and Operators

40-13.2-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Child” means any person less than eighteen (18) years of age, provided that a person over eighteen (18) years of age and not yet twenty-one (21) years of age who is nevertheless subject to continuing jurisdiction of the family court, pursuant to chapter 1 of title 14; or is identified as emotionally disturbed, as defined in chapter 7 of title 40.1 [repealed]; or is identified as developmentally delayed, in accordance with §

40.1-1-8

; shall be a child for purposes of this chapter.

“Department” means the department of children, youth and families.

“Director” means the director of the department of children, youth and families, or the designee of the director.

“Person” when used to describe the owner or operator of a facility that must be licensed or registered with the department or when used to describe a youth-serving agency worker includes individuals, associations, and corporations.

“Volunteer” means any person providing volunteer services who has supervisory or disciplinary authority over a child or children or whose work involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees or volunteers.

“Youth-serving agency” means any facility or program that is operated for more than two (2) hours per day at least one day per week and that provides programs and activities for children and employs persons who have supervisory or disciplinary authority over a child or children. School programs operated by schools certified under the provisions of title 16 are not considered youth-serving agencies pursuant to this chapter.

“Youth-serving agency worker” means any person in the employ of a youth-serving agency who has supervisory or disciplinary authority over a child or children or whose work involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees. This shall include any private vendor, independent contractor, contract employee or those who are hired by a third party that has contracted with the youth-serving agency to provide services and whose work involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 401, § 1.

40-13.2-2.
Qualification for childcare employment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any person seeking to operate or seeking employment in any facility which is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department of children, youth and families, the department of human services, or seeking employment at the training school for youth if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, shall undergo an employment background check, a CANTS (child abuse and neglect tracking system) check of substantiated complaints, and criminal records check as provided for in this chapter. The director of the department of children, youth and families and the director of the department of human services may by rule identify those positions requiring background checks, CANTS checks, and criminal records checks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 8.

40-13.2-3.
Employment background checks.

Any person seeking to operate a facility which is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department will submit an affidavit to the department providing information relating to individual employment history as shall be required by rule promulgated by the director. Any person operating a facility which is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department shall require all persons seeking employment, if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, to execute a similar affidavit prior to employment and will maintain the affidavit on file subject to inspection by the director. Failure to require the affidavit or failure to maintain the affidavit on file will be prima facie grounds to revoke the license or registration of the operator of the facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1.

40-13.2-3.1.
CANTS (Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System) check — Operators and employees.

Any person seeking to operate a facility which is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department or who is seeking employment, if the employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees in any facility which is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department or who is seeking such employment at the training school for youth shall, after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by §

40-13.2-3

, apply to the appropriate agency for a CANTS (child abuse and neglect tracking system) check. The department is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations to impose such fees or charges as may be appropriate to implement the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 411, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 17, § 2.

40-13.2-4.
Criminal records check — Operators of childcare facilities that must be licensed or registered with the department.

Any person seeking to operate a facility, that is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department of human services or the department of children, youth and families, shall apply to the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification, attorney general’s office, or the department of children, youth and families or the state or local police department, for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to the applicable federal standards, including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant, and any expense associated with providing the criminal records check shall be paid by the applicant and/or requesting agency. The director of the department of human services or the department of children, youth and families will determine by rule those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that constitute disqualifying information because that information would indicate that the employment could endanger the health or welfare of a child or children. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information with respect to a proposed operator, the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification will inform the director of the department of human services or the department of children, youth and families, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 220, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 240, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 154, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 8.

40-13.2-4.1.
Criminal records check — Operators of youth-serving agencies.

Any person seeking to operate a facility or program which is a youth-serving agency shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general’s office for a criminal records check. Those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that have been determined to constitute disqualifying information by the director pursuant to §

40-13.2-4

of this chapter shall also constitute items of disqualifying information pursuant to this section.

Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information, as defined in accordance with the rule promulgated by the director, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general’s office will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. In addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general’s office will inform the applicant, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general’s office will inform the applicant, in writing, of this fact.

The operator or proposed operator of the youth-serving agency will maintain on file a document issued by the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general’s office stating that no disqualifying information has been discovered as regards the operator or proposed operator of the youth-serving agency, and this document shall be made available for inspection by the parent(s)/guardian(s) of any child enrolled in the programs of the youth-serving agency. The operator will also maintain on file, and make available for inspection by the parent(s)/guardian(s) of any child enrolled in the programs of the youth-serving agency, evidence that criminal records checks have been obtained on all employees of the youth-serving agency pursuant to §

40-13.2-5.1

, and the results of the checks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 24.

40-13.2-5.
Criminal records check — Employees of child day care, daycare centers, family daycare homes, group family daycare homes, child-placing agencies and residential childcare facilities that must be licensed by the department.

Any person seeking employment in a “child day care” program, a “family daycare home,” “group family daycare home,” or in a “child daycare center” as defined in §

42-12.5-2

, if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, or any adult household member of any operator of a “family daycare home” and “group family daycare home,” or seeking that employment or to volunteer at the training school for youth, shall, after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by §

40-13.2-3

, apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney general, or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant. Further, any person seeking employment in a “child day care” program, in a “child daycare center,” and/or in a “child daycare provider” as defined in §

42-12.5-2

, if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general to conduct all necessary criminal background checks as required by the Child Care and Development Block Grant of 2014 (CCDBGA), Pub. L. No. 113-186. The criminal record checks as required by this section shall be conducted for every five (5) years of continuous childcare employment from the date of the previous criminal background check.

Any person seeking employment in a “child-placing agency” as defined in §

42-72.1-2

, if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, shall, after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by §

40-13.2-3

, apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney general or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant.

Any person seeking employment in a “childcaring agency,” “children’s behavioral health program,” or in a “foster and adoptive home” as defined in §

42-72.1-2

, that is, or is required to be, licensed or registered with the department of children, youth and families, shall, after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by §

40-13.2-3

, apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney general, or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 8.]

Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in accordance with the rule promulgated by the director, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general or the department of children, youth and families will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. In addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the office of the attorney general, or department of children, youth and families, or the local police department will inform the relevant employer, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general, or the department of children, youth and families will inform both the applicant and the employer, in writing, that no disqualifying information has been found.

Failure to show proof that the employer has initiated requests for background checks required by this section will be prima facie grounds to revoke the license or registration of the operator of the facility.

It will be the responsibility of the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the office of the attorney general, or the local police department, or the department of children, youth and families, to conduct the nationwide criminal records check pursuant to this section. The nationwide criminal records check will be provided to the applicant for employment. Any expense associated for providing the criminal records check shall be paid by the applicant and/or the requesting agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 24; P.L. 2016, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 154, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 8.

40-13.2-5.1.
Criminal records check — Employee of youth-serving agency.

Any person seeking employment or seeking to volunteer, if that employment or volunteering involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, in any facility or program that is a youth-serving agency shall file with the employer the affidavit required by §

40-13.2-3

. The affidavit shall be maintained on file by the employer and shall be made available for inspection by the parent(s)/guardian(s) of any child who is enrolled in the programs of the youth-serving agency.

Any person seeking employment or seeking to volunteer, if that employment or volunteering involves supervisory or disciplinary authority over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, in any youth-serving agency shall apply for a national criminal records check. The national criminal records check shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) by the bureau of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the division of the state police, or the local police department for a national criminal records check. The national criminal records check shall be processed prior to the commencement of employment or volunteer activity.

Those items of information appearing on a national criminal records check that have been determined to constitute disqualifying information by the director pursuant to §

40-13.2-4

shall also be items of disqualifying information pursuant to this section.

Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in accordance with the rule promulgated by the director, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the division of the state police, or the local police department will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. In addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the division of the state police, or the local police department will inform the applicant, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the division of the state police, or the local police department will inform both the applicant and the employer, in writing, of this fact.

The employer will maintain on file, and make available for inspection by the parent(s)/guardian(s) of any child enrolled in the programs of the youth-serving agency, evidence that criminal records checks have been obtained on all employees of the youth-serving agency pursuant to this section, and the results of the checks.

The applicant shall be responsible for the cost of conducting the national criminal records check through the bureau of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the division of the state police, or the local police department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 24; P.L. 2017, ch. 401, § 1.

40-13.2-5.2.
Criminal records check — Employees of the department of children, youth and families.

Any person seeking employment with the department of children, youth and families shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), department of attorney general, state police, or local police department where the applicant resides, or the department of children, youth and families, for a national and state criminal records check. The check shall conform to the applicable federal standards, including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant. The director shall determine by rule those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that constitute disqualifying information because the information would indicate that employment could endanger the health or welfare of a child or children and would be inconsistent with the purpose and intent of the department of children, youth and families.

The department of attorney general, the state police, or the local police department shall forward the results of the nationwide and state criminal record checks, including the nature of any criminal record, on the individual to the individual and to the department of children, youth and families. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information with respect to an applicant, the department of children, youth and families shall inform the applicant of the disqualifying information.

The cost of criminal record checks required by this section for individuals who are not currently employed by the state of Rhode Island shall be the responsibility of the applicant. The cost of criminal records checks required by this section for individuals who are currently employed by the state of Rhode Island shall be the responsibility of the department of children, youth and families.

Any individual required to submit to a criminal background check, state and/or federal, under subsection (a) above who has submitted to a criminal background check conducted within the previous six (6) months in accordance with §

14-1-34

and/or §

15-7-11

and/or §§

40-13.2-2

,

40-13.2-4

,

40-13.2-5

, and/or § 40-13.2-9, shall be exempt from an additional check but shall request the department of attorney general, the state police, or the local police department that conducted the check forward the results, including the nature of the criminal record, to the department of children, youth and families.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 154, § 3.

40-13.2-6.
Prior criminal records checks.

If an applicant for employment has undergone a criminal records check pursuant to §

40-13.2-4

,

40-13.2-4

.1,

40-13.2-5

, or

40-13.2-5

.1 within eighteen (18) months of an application for employment, then an employer may request from the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the attorney general’s office for employees of youth-serving agencies pursuant to §§

40-13.2-4.1

and

40-13.2-5.1

a letter indicating if any disqualifying information was discovered. The bureau of criminal identification will respond by stating if an item of disqualifying information was discovered without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information or by stating that no disqualifying information was discovered. The letter may be maintained on file to satisfy the requirements of § 40-13.2-4,

40-13.2-4.1

, 40-13.2-5, or

40-13.2-5.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 322, § 2.

40-13.2-7.
Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 1.

40-13.2-8.
Destruction of fingerprint records.

At the conclusion of any background check required by this chapter, the state police or the local police department will promptly destroy the fingerprint card of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 1.